Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-267
Authority; expenses; how paid; liability of state or political subdivision; prohibited.

All expenses incurred by the authority in carrying out the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act shall be payable solely from funds provided under such act, and nothing in such act shall be construed to authorize the authority to incur indebtedness or liability on behalf of or payable by this state or any political subdivision of this state.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 67.